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DTC B011 7/45 Short in Side Squib LH Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The side squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the side airbag assembly LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTCB0 117/45 is recordedwhengroundshort isdetected in thesidesquibLHcircuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0117/45
SShort insidesquibLHcircuit (toground)
SSidesquibLHmalfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SSideairbagassemblyLH(SidesquibLH)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SFloorNo. 1 wire

HINT:
DTCB0 117/45 is indicatedonly for thevehicleequippedwith thesideairbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−499.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2CheckfloorNo. 1 wire (sidesquibLHcircuit).

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and SFL+ of
the floorNo. 1 wireconnectoron thesideairbagassemblyLH
(side squib LH) side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NGRepairor replace floorNo. 1 wire.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect SFL+ and SFL− of the floor

No. 1 wire connector on the side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH) side.

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 117/45 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 117/45maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check side squib LH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the side airbag assembly LH (side squib LH)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 117/45 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 117/45maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


